Utah statutes.
59-1-207.   Administration plan -- Executive director's functions.

The commission shall prepare and implement a plan for the administration of the divisions and other offices of the commission which do not report directly to the commission.  The plan shall, by rule, establish the duties and responsibilities to be delegated to the executive director.



Enacted by Chapter 4, 1987 General Session

